Georgia, session 2025_26, SB324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 25 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to life insurance,
is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
S. B. 324
- 1 -

LC 52 0699
"33-25-16.
(a) An insurer that issues or issues for delivery a life insurance policy or annuity in this
state shall:
(1) Keep the agent of record with such policy or annuity even if such insurer sells such
policy or annuity to another insurer; provided, however, that, if such agent is retired or
deceased, such insurer shall provide a local agent when the owner of such policy makes
a request in writing or by electronic means, in a manner and form as prescribed by the
Commissioner;
(2) Provide company illustrations, information, status, and reprojections regarding such
policy or annuity to a local agent even if such agent does not have a contract with such
insurer when the owner of such policy or annuity makes a request in writing or by
electronic means, in a manner and form as prescribed by the Commissioner;
(3) Provide the owner of such policy or annuity with an annual notice report on the status
of such policy or annuity, even if such policy or annuity is fully paid, in a manner and
form as prescribed by the Commissioner; and
(4) Conduct a search of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners' policy
locator at least quarterly and shall report to the Commissioner annually the results of such
searches no later than January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter.
(b) The Commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations and establish procedures
necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 324
- 2 -